Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1480
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 28-1480 to 28-1482, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Civil disorder shall mean any public disturbance involving acts of violence which causes an immediate danger of or results in damage or injury to persons or property;

(2) Explosive or incendiary device shall mean (a) dynamite and all other forms of high explosives, (b) any explosive bomb, grenade, missile, or similar device, and (c) any incendiary bomb or grenade, firebomb, or similar device, including any device which (i) consists of or includes a breakable container including a flammable liquid or compound and a wick composed of any material which, when ignited, is capable of igniting such flammable liquid or compound and (ii) can be carried or thrown by one individual acting alone; and

(3) Firearm shall mean any weapon which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.

Laws 1986, LB 772, § 1.